Missouri, session 2026, HCR31.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, the state of Missouri recognizes the core importance of education
focused on patriotism, citizenship, and civics; and

WHEREAS, the state recognizes the significant importance of civic engagement; and

WHEREAS,the state celebrates such commitment on a local, state, and national level
on the part of our state's graduating seniors; and

WHEREAS, the state desires to support such education and graduating seniors by
awarding a "State of Missouri Seal of Civic Recognition" to each senior who meets the
specific criteria for various levels of the Seal of Civic Recognition; and

WHEREAS, the state hopes and expects that such award will garner recognition of
such student's efforts in the form of scholarships, financial assistance, internships,
apprenticeships, and other similar awards to aid such student's pursuit of future education
and vocational or professional career opportunities; and

WHEREAS, the state desires to commend a commitment to our beautiful state and
this nation through service in the Armed Forces of the United States, with the full and joyous
expectation that, after such student's term of service to this state and our nation, the student
will be heartily welcomed home with open arms by a grateful citizenry:


HCS HCR 31 2
NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby create the "State of Missouri Seal of Civic Recognition"
program; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the Civics and Patriotism Workgroup at the
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education will establish and advertise specific
criteria for achieving a bronze, silver, and gold level of the Seal of Civic Recognition that
may include levels for:

(1) Academic instruction and achievement in local, state, and national governance;
national and world history; or similar such curriculum recommended by the Civics and
Patriotism Workgroup at the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education;

(2) Participation and leadership in school-, community-, veteran-, or church-
sponsored clubs or organizations focused on reinforcing and building on such academic
instruction and civic engagement, such as Future Farmers of America, American Legion,
Kiwanis, Adoremus, and similar clubs and organizations; and

(3) Participating in mentorship programs focused on patriotism, citizenship, and civic
engagement that may include either opportunities to mentor, be mentored, or both. Such
programs may include those offered by local, state, and other government officials and civil
servants; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVEDthat names of seniors meeting the requirements for a
Seal of Civic Recognition, along with such senior's bronze, silver, or gold achievement level,
may be submitted by a participating school with cooperation from participating civic
organizations, if applicable, to the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education in a
method and manner determined by the Department; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that a graduating senior who accomplishes the
requirements to be eligible for a Seal of Civic Recognition shall be awarded the appropriate
Seal by the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education based on the established
criterion levels for Bronze, Silver, or Gold, and the school of the graduating senior will ensure
that a Seal of Civic Recognition will accompany such student's high school diploma; and


HCS HCR 31 3
BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the state encourages cooperating civic
organizations to provide support for such student's future vocational or professional
preparedness after the student's matriculation, which support may be in the form of direct
scholarship assistance, mentoring, accommodations, apprenticeships, internships, or other
similar incentives to aid such student's progress toward professional or vocational
advancement; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that a student who is a recipient of a Seal of Civic
Recognition and who commits to serve our nation in military service directly or through
enlistment in a Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) program will receive a "Letter of
Congratulations, Commendation, and State Gratitude" signed by the Governor, the Lieutenant
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives of the state of Missouri; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔